North Carolina, session 2025, SB362.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Aging, the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be allocated and used as
follows:
(1) The sum of one hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($145,000) for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of one hundred six thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars ($106,750) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to support the
operational expenses of the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program, including
costs associated with equipment, supplies, and transportation.
(2) The sum of eight hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($855,000) for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of eight hundred ninety-three thousand two
hundred fifty dollars ($893,250) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund nine
additional full-time Regional Ombudsman positions to move North Carolina
toward national standards for long-term care ombudsman programs. These
nine positions shall be dedicated to the Regional Ombudsman Programs
within the Area Agencies on Aging most in need of additional ombudsman
support, as determined by the Office of the State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman.
SECTION 2. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Aging, in
collaboration with the Office of the Long-Term Care Ombudsman, Regional Offices of
Long-Term Care Ombudsman within the Area Agencies on Aging, and other interested
stakeholders, shall study and make recommendations to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on statutory changes
necessary to improve and strengthen the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program and the system
of Community Advisory Committee volunteers supporting the Program.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S362-v-1*